Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 4. Public Records; Investigations.

Sec. 42.08.400.
Public records.

Except as provided in (b) and (c) of this section or prohibited from disclosure under state or federal law, records in the possession of the commission are open to public inspection at reasonable times.

The commission may by regulation classify records received from an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier or in-state natural gas pipeline as privileged records that are not open to the public for inspection.

A record filed with the commission that is a precedent agreement between an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier and an unregulated entity is a privileged record that is not open to the public for inspection. For a record that relates to a precedent agreement, or is or relates to a contract other than a precedent agreement between an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier and an unregulated entity, if an in-state natural gas pipeline carrier identifies the provisions of the record that contain information that, if disclosed, could adversely affect the competitive position of the shipper or could cause commercial or competitive harm or damage if disclosed and the commission agrees, the information shall be treated by the commission as confidential.

A person may make written objection to the public disclosure of information contained in a record filed under this chapter or of information obtained by the commission or by the attorney general under this chapter, stating the grounds for the objection. When an objection is made, the commission shall order the information withheld from public disclosure if the information adversely affects the interest of the person making written objection and disclosure is not required in the interest of the public.

A commissioner may certify as to all official records of the commission under this section and may certify as to all official acts of the commission under this chapter.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Sec. 42.08.410.
Investigations.

The commission may investigate any matter for which an investigation is authorized under this chapter. An investigation may be public, nonpublic, or both. In conducting an investigation, the commission may compel the attendance and testimony of witnesses and the production of records and testimony before the commission or its designee. In the course of an investigation, the commission may, subject to AS

44.23.020(e)

, exclude from attendance at the taking of investigative testimony all persons except a person compelled to attend, that person’s attorney, members of the commission or the commission’s staff, and a person authorized to transcribe the proceedings. In conducting an investigation related to a timely filed dispute, the commission shall issue a final order within 150 days after the date the formal complaint was filed with the commission, except for disputes related to open seasons, in which case, a final order must be issued within 60 days. If the commission has not acted within the applicable time period in this section, the dispute shall be considered to have been dismissed with prejudice.

History.

(§ 21 ch 11 SLA 2013)